Tennessee statutes. Title 13 Public Planning And Housing
Part 2

Redevelopment

13-20-201. Blighted areas and dilapidation defined.

“Blighted areas” are areas, including slum areas, with buildings or improvements that, by reason of dilapidation, obsolescence, overcrowding, lack of ventilation, light and sanitary facilities, deleterious land use, or any combination of these or other factors, are detrimental to the safety, health, morals, or welfare of the community. “Welfare of the community” does not include solely a loss of property value to surrounding properties, nor does it include the need for increased tax revenues. Under no circumstance shall land used predominantly in the production of agriculture, as defined by § 1-3-105, be considered a blighted area.

As used in this chapter, “dilapidation” means extreme deterioration and decay due to lack of repairs to and care of the area.

Acts 1945, ch. 114, § 2; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29N (Williams, § 3647.53); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-813; Acts 1982, ch. 816, § 1; 2006, ch. 863, §§ 2, 14.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 2 purported to add a new subsection (c) with provisions exactly the same as the provisions added as the third sentence of (a) by ch. 863, § 14; therefore, ch. 863, § 2 was not given effect.

Acts 2006, ch. 863, § 25, provided that the amendment by that act shall apply only to eminent domain or condemnation proceedings initiated on or after July 1, 2006.

Cross-References. False statement of financial condition for purposes of occupancy in a housing project, § 39-14-120.

Local neighborhood model development corporations, title 13, ch. 13.

Power and use of eminent domain, title 29, ch. 17, part 1.

Law Reviews.

Property Rights vs. Public Use: Analyzing Tennessee's Response to Kelo Eminent Domain Ruling (Scott Griswold), 43 Tenn B.J. 14 (2007).

The Private Use of Public Power: The Private University and the Power of Eminent Domain; Part Three, Private University Expansion Through Section 112 — A Case Study, IV (formal planning), IX (residents' day in court), 2 Vand. L. Rev. 681, 733, 792.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality of provision exempting agricultural land from consideration as a blighted area, OAG 06-098 (5/26/06), 2006 Tenn. AG LEXIS 107.

13-20-202. Powers of housing authority as to blighted areas.

Any housing authority now or hereafter established under and pursuant to this chapter, including any municipal housing authority whether created under and pursuant to such law or of any special statute, may carry out any undertaking hereinafter called a “redevelopment project” and to that end may:

Acquire blighted areas;

Acquire other real property for the purpose of removing, preventing, or reducing blight, blighting factors, or the causes of blight;

Acquire real property where the condition of the title, the diverse ownership of the real property to be assembled, the street or lot layouts, or other conditions, prevent a proper development of the property and where the acquisition of the area by the authority is necessary to carry out a redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan;

Acting on its own or through third parties engaged to act on the housing authority's behalf:

Clear any areas acquired, including relocation of utility facilities and demolition, in whole or in part, of buildings and improvements thereon and removal or remediation of any environmental contamination;

Install, construct, or reconstruct streets, utilities, and site improvements essential to the preparation and development of sites for uses in accordance with a redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan;

Install, construct, or reconstruct parks, public open spaces, public playgrounds, pedestrian ways and all parking structures regardless of use in accordance with a redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan;

Pay expenses for relocation, administrative costs, planning and engineering costs, energy efficiency costs and legal expenses associated with exercising the powers granted in this section or with carrying out a redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan;

Pay the design costs, commissioning costs and fees and costs of required documentation associated with meeting the requirements of Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design (LEED), Green Globes or other similar programs, as well as greening costs and energy modeling costs for certification by such programs of new construction, existing buildings and other projects;

Install, construct, add to, improve or reconstruct public infrastructure, including, but not limited to, water, solid waste, transportation, telecommunication, energy use capture and transmittal, power systems and alternative power systems or alternate power projects that incorporate principles of urban sustainability, eco-efficiency and global sustainable development; and

Take all other necessary actions designed to further the goals and local objectives articulated in the redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan, including, but not limited to, the assistance, undertaking, or development of projects that promote affordable rental housing, including mixed-income rental housing, primarily for persons of low and moderate income, as determined by the board of commissioners of the authority. The authority may exercise all powers with respect to such projects in the same manner as mixed-finance projects for persons of low income as provided in part 1 of this chapter;

Sell or lease land so acquired for uses in accordance with the redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan;

Accomplish a combination of the foregoing to carry out a redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan;

Have and enjoy all the rights, powers, privileges and immunities granted to housing authorities under such law, and/or under any special act by which the authority may have been created, and/or any other provisions of law relating to slum clearance and housing projects for persons of low income; and

Borrow money upon its bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness to finance any of the foregoing and to carry out a redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan and secure the same by pledges of its income and revenues generally or its income and revenues from a particular redevelopment project or projects, including moneys received by any authority and placed in a special fund or funds pursuant to tax increment financing provisions contained in a redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan, or from grants or contributions from any government, or in any other manner;

Nothing contained in § 13-20-113, § 13-20-413 and/or in any special municipal housing authorities law shall be construed as limiting the power of an authority, in the event of default by a purchaser or lessee of land in a redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan, to acquire property and operate it free from restrictions contained in §§ 13-20-113 and 13-20-413, or in any special statute as aforementioned relating to tenant selection or operation without profit.

For the purposes of this section and the implementation of redevelopment districts as delineated in §§ 13-20-201 — 13-20-205, community development agencies as defined in the Community Development Act of 1974, as amended, of municipalities, will also be considered as housing authorities and will have vested in them the powers as delineated in this section in which housing authority redevelopment powers are vested, as long as public notice required in § 13-20-203 is provided. This subsection (b) applies only in counties with populations greater than eight hundred thousand (800,000), according to the 1990 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and in counties with populations greater than one hundred thirty-four thousand seven hundred (134,700) and less than one hundred thirty-four thousand eight hundred (134,800), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

For the purposes of this part, a development authority created by private act and designated by a municipality as its housing and redevelopment authority for purposes of this part shall also be considered a housing authority and shall have the power to enter into an economic development agreement as defined in § 4-17-302(2) and the powers delineated in this part, in which housing authority redevelopment powers are vested, as long as public notice required in § 13-20-203 is provided; provided, however, a municipality shall not so designate a development authority if the housing authority, if any, created by the municipality has ever issued any obligations secured by tax increment revenues and in any event such designation shall only be effective if the municipality shall first obtain the written consent of the housing authority, if any, created by the municipality. Any redevelopment plan previously prepared by a development authority created pursuant to any such private act and approved by a municipality shall be deemed authorized by this subsection (c) and shall be deemed a valid redevelopment plan for purposes of this part.

Acts 1945, ch. 114, §§ 2, 3; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.290 (Williams, §§ 3647.53, 3647.54); Acts 1978, ch. 854, § 2; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-814; Acts 1998, ch. 619, § 1; 1999, ch. 332, § 1; 2004, ch. 772, § 1; 2005, ch. 352, § 2; 2009, ch. 406, § 1; 2009, ch. 491, § 1; 2010, ch. 1126, § 1; 2020, ch. 609, § 1.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

For the Preamble to the act regarding the use of sustainable infrastructure, energy efficiency technologies, green building and other modern practices in redevelopment projects, please refer to Acts 2009, ch. 491.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (a)(4)(G), inserted “, including, but not limited to, the assistance, undertaking, or development of projects that promote affordable rental housing, including mixed-income rental housing, primarily for persons of low and moderate income, as determined by the board of commissioners of the authority” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 609, § 2. March 25, 2020.

Law Reviews.

Constitutional Law — Eminent Domain for Slum Clearance — Effect of Sale or Lease of Property to Private Persons for Redevelopment, 5 Vand. L. Rev. 102.

13-20-203. Conditions precedent to initiation of redevelopment project — Approval by municipality of plan.

This subsection (a) shall apply to counties with a metropolitan form of government and with populations greater than seven hundred seventy thousand (770,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

An authority shall not initiate any redevelopment project under this chapter until the governing body, or agency designated by it or empowered by law so to act, of each city or town, herein called “municipalities,” and any county having a population of not less than two hundred seventy-five thousand (275,000) nor more than three hundred twenty-five thousand (325,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, in which any of the area to be covered by the project is situated, has approved a plan, herein called the “redevelopment plan”, which provides an outline for the development or redevelopment of the area and is sufficiently complete, to:

Indicate its relationship to definite local objectives as to appropriate land uses and improved traffic, public transportation, public utilities, recreational and community facilities and other public improvements;

Indicate proposed land uses and building requirements in the area; and

Indicate the method of the temporary relocation of persons living in such areas, and also the method of providing, unless already available, decent, safe and sanitary dwellings substantially equal in number to the number of substandard dwellings to be cleared from the area, at rents within the financial reach of the income groups displaced from such substandard dwellings. Such municipalities are hereby authorized to approve redevelopment plans through their governing body or agency designated by it for that purpose. Any state public body referred to in § 13-20-110 has the rights and powers to cooperate with and assist housing authorities with respect to redevelopment projects in the same manner as though the section were applicable to redevelopment projects.

Any disapproval of any redevelopment project by the governing body of a county as authorized by this section shall, however, be automatically dissolved wherever written agreement duly approved by the governing body of the municipality involved is furnished to the county governing body involved, which agreement shall exempt the county property tax levy and all proceeds from it generated within the redevelopment project from the tax increment financing provisions specified in § 13-20-205(a)(2).

The governing body shall not approve a plan until after a public hearing has been held by the governing body, or agency designated by it or empowered by law so to act, to determine the necessity for the adoption of the plan, including the matters set forth in subdivisions (a)(2)(A)-(C). Notice of such public hearing shall be given in the following manner:

By publishing once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks immediately preceding the public hearing in each newspaper of general circulation published in the municipality notice of the time, place, and purpose of the public hearing, which notice shall include a facsimile of a map of the area to be included in the plan, with the streets or other lines marking the boundaries thereof clearly indicated, and which map shall be not less than four (4) columns in width; and

By written notice to at least one (1) of the owners or at least one (1) of the occupants of each parcel of property within the area to be included within the plan of the time, place and purpose of such public hearing, which notice shall be sent not more than thirty (30) days and not less than ten (10) days before the hearing by mail, postage prepaid, or delivered, to such owners or occupants.

The failure to give the notice required in subdivisions (a)(4)(A) and (B) may be raised only by an owner or occupant having an interest in property within such area as a defense on the trial of the issue of the right of the housing authority to acquire the property of such owner or occupant by eminent domain, and such failure shall constitute a defense unless in the judgment of the court trying such issue there has been compliance with subdivision (a)(4)(A) and substantial compliance with subdivision (a)(4)(B) by mailing or delivering the notice therein provided to at least one (1) owner or one (1) occupant of each of not less than two thirds (2/3) of the lots or parcels of property within such area.

This subsection (b) shall not apply to counties with a metropolitan form of government and with populations greater than seven hundred seventy thousand (770,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

An authority shall not initiate any redevelopment project under this chapter until the governing body, or agency designated by it or empowered by law so to act, of each city or town, hereafter called “municipalities,” in which any of the area to be covered by such project is situated, has approved a plan, herein called the “redevelopment plan,” which provides an outline for the development or redevelopment of such area and is sufficiently complete to:

Indicate its relationship to definite local objectives as to appropriate land uses and improved traffic, public transportation, public utilities, recreational and community facilities and other public improvements;

Indicate proposed land uses and building requirements in the area; and

Indicate the method of the temporary relocation of persons living in such areas, and also the method of providing, unless already available, decent, safe and sanitary dwellings substantially equal in number to the number of substandard dwellings to be cleared from the area, at rents within the financial reach of the income groups displaced from such substandard dwellings.

For any redevelopment plan that includes a tax increment financing provision that is applicable to the county property tax levy, the governing body of any county in which any of the area subject to such redevelopment plan is situated must approve such redevelopment plan.

Any disapproval of any redevelopment project by the governing body of a county as authorized by this section shall, however, be automatically dissolved wherever written agreement duly approved by the governing body of the municipality involved is furnished to the county governing body involved, which agreement shall exempt the county property tax levy, and all proceeds from it generated within the redevelopment project, from the tax increment financing provisions specified in § 13-20-205(a)(2).

The governing body shall not approve a plan until after a public hearing has been held by the governing body, or agency designated by it or empowered by law so to act, to determine the necessity for the adoption of the plan, including the matters set forth in subdivisions (b)(2)(A)(i)-(iii). Notice of such public hearing shall be given in the following manner:

By publishing notice, once a week for three (3) consecutive weeks immediately preceding the public hearing in a newspaper of general circulation published in the municipality, of the time, place, and purpose of the public hearing and identifying at least two (2) locations, one (1) of which shall be the offices of the authority, where a map of the area to be included in the plan, with the streets or other lines marking the boundaries of the area clearly indicated, may be reviewed by interested persons; and

By written notice to at least one (1) of the owners or at least one (1) of the occupants of each parcel of property within the area to be included within the plan of the time, place and purpose of such public hearing, which notice shall be sent not more than thirty (30) days and not less than ten (10) days before the hearing by mail, postage prepaid, or delivered, to such owners or occupants.

The failure to give the notice required in subdivisions (b)(4)(A) and (B) may be raised only by an owner or occupant having an interest in property within such area as a defense on the trial of the issue of the right of the housing authority to acquire the property of such owner or occupant by eminent domain, and such failure shall constitute a defense unless in the judgment of the court trying such issue there has been compliance with subdivision (b)(4)(A) and substantial compliance with subdivision (b)(4)(B) by mailing or delivering the notice therein provided to at least one (1) owner or one (1) occupant of each of not less than two thirds (2/3) of the lots or parcels of property within such area.

Acts 1945, ch. 114, § 4; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29P (Williams, § 3647.55); Acts 1963, ch. 225, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-815; Acts 1982, ch. 906, §§ 1, 2, 6; 1987, ch. 349, §§ 1, 2, 4, 5; 2006, ch. 999, §§ 5-7.

Compiler's Notes. Portions of this section concerning counties of 275,000 to 325,000 have been held unconstitutional. See Notes To Decisions; Constitutionality; Knoxville's Community Dev. Corp. v. Knox County, 665 S.W.2d 704 (Tenn. 1984).

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Law Reviews.

The Private Use of Public Power: The Private University and the Power of Eminent Domain; Part Three, Private University Expansion Through Section 112 — A Case Study, IX (residents' day in court), 27 Vand. L. Rev. 681, 792.

13-20-204. Disposal and use of land consistent with redevelopment plan — Purchase by owner occupant.

The authority may make land in a redevelopment project available for use by private enterprise or public agencies in accordance with the redevelopment plan. Such land may be made available at its use value, which represents the value, whether expressed in terms of rental or capital price, at which the authority determines such land should be made available in order that it may be developed or redeveloped for the purposes specified in such plan.

To assure that land acquired in a redevelopment project is used in accordance with the redevelopment plan, an authority, upon the sale or lease of such land, shall obligate purchasers or lessees to:

Use the land for the purpose designated in the redevelopment plan;

Begin the building of their improvements within a period of time which the authority fixes as reasonable; or, except in counties having a population of:

not less than nor more than

23,751 23,759

25,501 25,999

28,600 28,650

44,000 45,999

according to the 1960 federal census or any subsequent federal census, if the purchaser is a public agency which proposes to develop such lands as an industrial park or to meet the needs of specific industrial prospects, carry on a program for attracting industry and develop such land for this purpose when and as needed, in counties of this state having a population of not less than two hundred thirty seven thousand (237,000) nor more than two hundred fifty thousand (250,000), according to the federal census of 1960 or any subsequent federal census; and

Comply with such other conditions as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

Any such obligations by the purchaser shall be covenants and conditions running with the land where the authority so stipulates.

As used in this subsection (c):

“Developer” means any private enterprise or public agency developing or redeveloping residential property as provided in this subsection (c);

“Owner occupant” means the person having title to and residing at the residential property at the time it was acquired by eminent domain; and

“Residential units” includes one-family and two-family dwellings and dwelling units as defined in this chapter.

On redevelopment projects developed after June 8, 1989, the authority shall provide the opportunity for owner occupants of residential property acquired by eminent domain for a redevelopment project to relocate within the project area if or at such time as residential units are constructed and offered for sale to the general public as a part of the project. A developer shall publish a notice in a newspaper of general circulation within the county where the project area is located. Such notice shall provide to each owner occupant of residential property acquired by eminent domain for a redevelopment project an offer to relocate within the project area. The notice shall contain a description of the property to be redeveloped. The notice shall contain a name and address to whom the owner occupant may respond to accept the offer. The developer shall also record the notice in the registrar's office. Each owner occupant shall have ninety (90) days from the date of publication to accept the offer contained in the notice. Any acceptance shall be in writing. Any owner occupant who has not responded to the notice before the expiration of the ninety (90) days from publication shall be deemed to have rejected such offer, and any interest therein shall be deemed to be terminated.

This subsection (c) shall apply only if the initial redevelopment project for which such property is acquired is for residential purposes.

No provision of this subsection (c) shall be construed to vest any interest or rights in the heirs or estate of any deceased owner occupant.

This subsection (c) shall not apply to residential units or dwelling units developed under programs limiting income of purchasers to a certain maximum income or other requirements for which the original owner occupant is not eligible.

This subsection (c) shall only apply in counties having a population of not less than four hundred seventy-seven thousand (477,000) nor more than four hundred seventy-eight thousand (478,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census.

Acts 1945, ch. 114, § 5; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29Q (Williams, § 3647.56); Acts 1965, ch. 194, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-816; Acts 1989, ch. 570, §§ 1, 2.

Compiler's Notes. For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

13-20-205. Redevelopment plan containing tax increment financing provisions — Allocation of taxes collected — Contents of plan — Tax status of property leased.

Any authority may, and is authorized to, adopt a redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan so that it contains a tax increment financing provision providing that taxes, if any, levied upon property within the boundaries of the redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan each year, by any taxing agency after the effective date of the resolution of the governing body approving the redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan or amendment, shall be divided as follows:

For properties subject to a redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan containing or amended to contain a tax increment financing provision approved prior to July 1, 2006, that portion of the taxes which would be produced by the rate at which the tax is levied each year by each taxing agency, upon the assessed value of such property as shown upon the assessment roll of the appropriate assessor, as of the date of the most recently determined valuation prior to the acquisition of such property by the authority (the assessed value being herein called the “base assessment”) shall be allocated to, and when collected, shall be paid to, the respective taxing agencies as taxes levied by such taxing agencies on all other property are paid; provided, that in any year in which the actual assessment of the area comprising a redevelopment project is less than the base assessment, there shall be allocated and paid to the respective taxing agencies only those taxes actually produced by the application of the current tax rates against such actual assessment. For properties subject to a redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan containing or amended to contain a tax increment financing provision approved after July 1, 2006, the base assessment of the property for purposes of this subdivision (a)(1) shall be determined as of the date of the most recently determined valuation prior to the date on which the redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan or amendment of the plan was approved by the applicable municipality or municipalities pursuant to § 13-20-203;

All the taxes levied in each year in excess of the amount provided for in subdivision (a)(1) shall be allocated to and, when collected, shall be paid into a special fund or funds of the authority to pay the principal of and interest on bonds, loans or other indebtedness incurred or to be incurred by the authority to finance or refinance, in whole or in part, the redevelopment project contemplated by such redevelopment plan;

Upon the retirement of all bonds, loans or other indebtedness incurred by the authority and payable from such special fund or funds or at such time as moneys on deposit in such special fund or funds are sufficient for such purpose, all the taxes referred to in subdivision (a)(2) shall, when collected, be paid to the respective taxing agencies as taxes levied by such taxing agencies on all other property are paid; and

Taxes shall be levied and collected over all or any part of the area comprising a redevelopment project in the manner provided by law with the following exceptions:

The appropriate assessor shall, in each year during the period in which taxes are to be allocated to the authority pursuant to subdivision (a)(2), compute and certify the net amount, if any, by which the then current assessed value of all taxable property located within the redevelopment project which is subject to taxation by the particular taxing agency exceeds the base assessment. The net amount of any such increase is referred to in this subdivision (a)(4) as the incremental value for that particular year;

In any year in which taxes are to be allocated to the authority pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) in which there is an incremental value, the appropriate assessor shall exclude it from the assessed value upon which the appropriate assessor computes the tax rates for taxes levied that year by the taxing agency. However, the appropriate assessor shall extend the aggregate tax rate of such taxes against the base assessment and the incremental value and shall apply the taxes collected therefrom, subject to any other provisions hereof, as provided above; and

For purposes of this section, if in any year property comprising a portion of a particular redevelopment project shall be removed from the tax rolls of a taxing agency, the base assessment for the area of such redevelopment project shall be reduced by the amount of the base assessment allocable to the property so removed for each subsequent year in which taxes are to be allocated to a particular authority pursuant to the above provisions.

If an authority adopts a redevelopment plan or an amendment to an existing plan which includes tax increment financing provisions, such new plan or the existing plan, as so amended, shall describe, in addition to the matters required by § 13-20-203(a)(2)(A)-(C) and (b)(2)(A)(i)-(iii), the following:

An estimate of the cost of the redevelopment project;

The sources of revenue to finance the costs of the project, including the estimated tax increment;

An estimate of the amount and the final maturity of bonded or other indebtedness to be incurred; and

An estimate of the impact of the tax increment financing provision upon all taxing agencies in which the redevelopment project is to be located.

The foregoing information set forth in this subsection (b) shall be made available to the public not less than five (5) days prior to the date set for the public hearing hereinafter required by subsection (c).

Except in counties having a metropolitan form of government or a population greater than seven hundred seventy thousand (770,000), according to the 1980 federal census or any subsequent federal census, no redevelopment plan containing a tax increment financing provision or amendment to an existing plan adding a tax increment financing provision shall be effective unless and until it has been approved by the governing body of the municipality and the governing body of the county affected, following a public hearing as provided in § 13-20-203, except that the approval of the governing body of the county affected shall not be required wherever its disapproval of a redevelopment project has been dissolved as prescribed by § 13-20-203(b)(3).

The notice of the public hearing shall be given in the manner and shall contain the information required by § 13-20-203 and shall additionally set forth in clear and plain language the contemplated use of tax increment financing in connection with the redevelopment project. Such notice shall also set forth where the information required by subsection (b) may be obtained. Not less than twenty-one (21) days prior to the date set for the public hearing, the governing body shall deliver or mail, postage prepaid, to each taxing agency currently levying taxes upon any property in the project area, and which would be affected by the tax increment financing provision, a copy of the notice of the public hearing, together with a statement that if the redevelopment plan containing a tax increment financing provision or amendment to an existing plan adding a tax increment financing provision is approved, certain property taxes resulting from increases in assessed valuation of property situated within the area included in the plan above the assessed value of such property appearing on the appropriate assessment rolls as last determined prior to the date on which the redevelopment plan or urban renewal plan or amendment of the plan was approved by the applicable municipality or municipalities may be allocated to a special fund or funds of the authority for redevelopment purposes rather than being paid into the treasury of the taxing agency.

The foregoing provisions of subsections (b) and (c) shall not apply to any redevelopment plan or amendment to an existing plan which included a tax increment financing provision and which has been submitted to and approved by the governing body of the municipality, or agency designated by it or empowered by law so to act, in which any of the area to be covered by the redevelopment project is situated pursuant to and in accordance with § 13-20-203 prior to April 11, 1978, and the previously approved redevelopment plan or amendment thereto described above shall not be required to be resubmitted and approved by the governing body or agency pursuant to the additional provision of subsections (b) and (c). The remaining provisions of this section shall be applicable to and govern the previously approved plan and the tax increment financing provision contained in such plan.

After the approval by the governing body of a redevelopment plan containing a tax increment financing provision or an amendment to an existing plan adding a tax increment financing provision, the authority shall transmit to the appropriate assessors of property and to each taxing agency to be affected a copy of the description of all land within the redevelopment area and the date or dates of the approval of the redevelopment plan or amendment to the plan, a copy of the resolution approving the redevelopment plan or approving an amendment to the plan, and a map or plat indicating the boundaries of the property; and taxes shall thereafter, when collected, be allocated and paid in the manner provided in the redevelopment plan or amendment to the plan.

Any property which the authority leases to private individuals or corporations for development under a redevelopment plan and any property which the authority has developed under a redevelopment plan and leases to private individuals or corporations shall have the same tax status as if such leased property were owned by such private individuals or corporations. After June 1, 1997, the foregoing provisions of this subsection (f) shall apply only to property financed with tax increment financing. Prior to June 1, 1997, any property owned, constructed, or improved by the authority which is not financed through tax increment financing shall have the same tax status as all other property owned by the authority.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this section, taxes levied upon property subject to tax increment financing provisions by any taxing agency for the payment of principal of and interest on all bonds, loans or other indebtedness of such taxing agency, and taxes levied by or for the benefit of the state of Tennessee, shall not be subject to allocation as provided in subsection (a), but shall be levied against such property and, when collected, paid to such taxing agency as taxes levied by such taxing agency on all other property are paid and collected.

In the event of any conflict between this section or this chapter and the Uniformity in Tax Increment Financing Act of 2012, compiled in title 9, chapter 23, title 9, chapter 23 shall control.

Acts 1945, ch. 114, § 6; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29R (Williams, § 3647.57); Acts 1977, ch. 186, § 1; 1978, ch. 854, § 3; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-817; Acts 1982, ch. 906, §§ 3, 4, 6; 1987, ch. 349, § 3; 1997, ch. 254, § 1; 2006, ch. 999, §§ 8-11; 2008, ch. 971, § 1; 2009, ch. 406, §§ 2-4; 2012, ch. 605, § 5.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 1 provided that the act, which added title 9, ch. 23, amended §§ 7-53-312, 7-53-314 and 13-20-205 and added a section to the CRA Act, which is the Community Redevelopment Act of 1998, as amended, being chapter 987 of the Public Acts of 1998, which act has not been codified, is and may be cited as the “Uniformity in Tax Increment Financing Act of 2012.”

Acts 2012, ch. 605, § 8 provided that the act shall not apply to a plan, or any amendment to such plan, for which required public hearings were conducted prior to March 21, 2012, without the concurrence of the tax increment agency, all affected taxing agencies, and the holders of any indebtedness secured by the tax revenues allocable pursuant to the plan.

Acts 2008, ch. 971, § 1 provided that the code commission is directed to change all references to “tax assessor”, wherever such references appear, to “assessor of property”, as such sections are amended or volumes are replaced. See § 1-1-116.

Section 5 of Acts 1982, ch. 906 provided that the 1982 amendment “shall not apply in any county having a population of not less than 770,000 nor more than 780,000 according to the 1980 federal census of population or any subsequent federal census.”

For table of U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Cross-References. Special fund for repayment of indebtedness on redevelopment projects, § 13-20-614.

13-20-206. Authority authorized to obtain financial aid from federal government for redevelopment project.

An authority may borrow money or accept contributions from the federal government to assist in its undertaking redevelopment projects. An authority may do any and all things necessary or desirable to secure such financial aid (including obligating itself in any contract with the federal government for annual contributions to convey to the federal government the project to which the contract relates upon the occurrence of a substantial default thereunder), in the same manner as it may do to secure such aid in connection with slum clearance and housing projects under this chapter.

Acts 1945, ch. 114, § 7; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29S (Williams, § 3647.58); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-818.

Cross-References. Mortgaging, power of, when project financed with aid of government, § 13-20-604.

13-20-207. Bonds for redevelopment projects — Security for public deposits and legal investments.

Bonds or other obligations issued by a housing authority in connection with a redevelopment project pursuant to §§ 13-20-201 — 13-20-208 shall be security for public deposits and legal investments to the same extent and for the same persons, institutions, associations, corporations, and other bodies and officers as bonds or other obligations issued pursuant to this chapter, in connection with the development of slum clearance or housing projects.

Acts 1945, ch. 114, § 8; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29T (Williams, § 3647.59); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-819.

Cross-References. Housing authority obligations guaranteed by federal government eligible collateral as security for deposit of funds, § 13-11-112.

13-20-208. Advisory board — Personnel.

For the purpose of coordinating its activities and undertakings under §§ 13-20-201 — 13-20-208 with the needs and undertakings of other local organizations and groups, a housing authority may establish an advisory board consisting of the chair of the authority, who shall be chair of the advisory board, and of sufficient members to represent, so far as practicable, the general public and users of housing, general business interests, real estate, building and home financing interest, labor, any official planning body in the locality, and church and welfare groups. The members of the advisory board shall be appointed by the chair of the authority.

Acts 1945, ch. 114, § 9; C. Supp. 1950, § 3647.29U (Williams, § 3647.60); T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 13-820.